New York, session 2025-2026, S8544.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 178.00 of the penal law, as added 2 by chapter 81 of the laws of 1995, is amended to read as follows: 3 3. (a) "Criminal diversion act" means an act or acts in which a person 4 knowingly: 5 [(a)] (i) transfers or delivers, in exchange for anything of pecuniary 6 value, a prescription medication or device with knowledge or reasonable 7 grounds to know that the recipient has no medical need for it; or 8 [(b)] (ii) receives, in exchange for anything of pecuniary value, a 9 prescription medication or device with knowledge or reasonable grounds 10 to know that the seller or transferor is not authorized by law to sell 11 or transfer such prescription medication or device; or 12 [(c)] (iii) transfers or delivers a prescription in exchange for 13 anything of pecuniary value; or 14 [(d)] (iv) receives a prescription in exchange for anything of pecuni- 15 ary value. 16 (b) The prescribing, dispensing, or receipt of brand name or generic 17 mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion shall not be 18 considered a criminal diversion act for purposes of this definition 19 solely because it is no longer approved by the federal food and drug 20 administration or because it no longer bears the label currently in 21 effect, provided that: 22 (i) its labeling was true and accurate at the time of manufacture; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13908-02-5 S. 8544 2 1 (ii) the drug is recommended for the purpose for which it was 2 prescribed under World Health Organization guidelines that are current 3 at the time of prescribing or dispensing. 4 § 2. Subdivision 13 of section 6802 of the education law, as added by 5 chapter 987 of the laws of 1971, is amended to read as follows: 6 13. "Misbranding". a. If a drug, device or cosmetic is alleged to be 7 misbranded because the labeling is misleading, or if an advertisement is 8 alleged to be false because it is misleading then in determining whether 9 the labeling or advertisement is misleading there shall be taken into 10 account (among other things) not only representations made or suggested 11 by statement, word, design, device, sound or any combination thereof, 12 but also the extent to which the labeling fails to reveal facts material 13 in the light of such representations or material with respect to conse- 14 quences which may result from the use of the drug, device, or cosmetic 15 to which the labeling or advertising relates under the conditions of use 16 prescribed in the labeling or advertising thereof or under such condi- 17 tions of use as are customary or usual. 18 b. No drug, device or cosmetic which is subject to, and complies with 19 regulations promulgated under the provisions of the federal food, drug, 20 and cosmetic act, relating to adulteration and misbranding shall be 21 deemed to be adulterated or misbranded in violation of the provisions of 22 this article because of its failure to comply with the board's regu- 23 lations, or the rules of the state board of pharmacy, insofar as the 24 regulations are in conflict with regulations relating to adulteration 25 and misbranding under the federal food, drug and cosmetic act. 26 c. Notwithstanding paragraph b of this subdivision, brand name or 27 generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion shall not 28 be deemed to be adulterated or misbranded in violation of the provisions 29 of this article solely because it is no longer approved or no longer 30 bears the label currently in effect, provided that (1) its labeling was 31 true and accurate at the time of manufacture; and (2) the drug is recom- 32 mended for the purpose for which it was prescribed under World Health 33 Organization guidelines that are current at the time of prescribing or 34 dispensing. 35 § 3. Section 6815 of the education law is amended by adding a new 36 subdivision 3 to read as follows: 37 3. Drugs used for medication abortion. Brand name or generic mifepri- 38 stone or any drug used for medication abortion shall not be deemed an 39 adulterated or misbranded drug in violation of the provisions of this 40 article solely because it is no longer approved or no longer bears the 41 label currently in effect, provided that: 42 a. its labeling was true and accurate at the time of manufacture; and 43 b. the drug is recommended for the purpose for which it was prescribed 44 under World Health Organization guidelines that are current at the time 45 of prescribing or dispensing. 46 § 4. Severability. If any item, clause, sentence, subparagraph, subdi- 47 vision, section or other part of this act, or the application thereof to 48 any person or circumstances shall be held to be invalid, such holding 49 shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of this act, or the 50 application of such section or part of a section held invalid, to any 51 other person or circumstances, but shall be confined in its operation to 52 the item, clause, sentence, subparagraph, subdivision, section or other 53 part of this act directly involved in such holding, or to the person and 54 circumstances therein involved. 55 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.